District of Columbia statutes.
31-1337

Disputed claims.

(a)

When a claim is denied in whole or in part by the liquidator, written notice of the determination shall be given to the claimant, or his or her attorney, by first class mail at the address shown in the proof of claim. Within 60 days from the mailing of the notice, the claimant may file his or her objections with the liquidator. If no filing is made, the claimant may not further object to the determination.

(b)

Whenever objections are filed with the liquidator and the liquidator does not alter his or her denial of the claim as a result of the objections, the liquidator shall ask the court for a hearing as soon as practicable and give notice of the hearing by first class mail to the claimant, or his or her attorney, and to any other persons directly affected, not less than 10 nor more than 30 days before the date of the hearing. The matter may be heard by the court or by a court-appointed referee who shall submit findings of fact along with his or her recommendation.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 38, 40 DCR 5773
This section is referenced in § 31-1341 and § 31-1354.
1981 Ed., § 35-2837.